Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-701.04
Emergency seat of government; temporary location; validity of official acts.

During such time as such temporary location or locations shall remain the emergency seat of state government, all official acts done or performed thereat by or on the part of any officer, office, department, division, commission, court or board, or any other agency or authority of this state, including the Legislature, whether in regular, extraordinary, or emergency session, and all proceedings or court actions involving the state or its agencies or authorities, now or hereafter required to be brought or conducted at the seat of state government, shall be as valid, effective, and binding as if regularly done, performed, brought, or conducted at the permanent seat of state government.

Laws 1959, c. 332, § 4, p. 1208.